Hawaii statutes.
§604-7.3 Change of venue. After the
parties shall have had an opportunity to be heard, any district court may, in
its discretion, upon satisfactory proof that it would be more fair and
equitable to the parties thereto if any civil case pending in the court were
heard in another jurisdiction, change the venue to the district court of some
other circuit and order the record to be transferred thereto; provided that any
district court may, in its discretion, upon the consent of all the parties to
any civil or criminal case pending in the court, change the venue to the
district court of some other circuit and order the record to be transferred
thereto. [L 1971, c 144, §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next